de: Mikrofongewinde: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Sonstiges
it: Filettatura del microfono: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Altro
sk-SK: Mikrofónový závit: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Iné
pl: Gwint mikrofonu: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Inne
sl-SI: Navoj mikrofona: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Drugo
ru: Резьба микрофона: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Другая
nl: Microfoondraad: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Andere
el: Σπείρωμα μικροφώνου: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Άλλο
bg-BG: Резба за микрофон: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Други
ja: マイク用のねじ: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; その他
zh-TW: 麥克風螺紋: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; 其他
vi: Ren micrô: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Khác
pt-PT: Fio de microfone: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Outro
cs: Závit mikrofonu: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Jiné
lt-LT: Mikrofono sriegis: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Kita
ro-RO: Filet microfon: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Altele
th: เธรดไมโครโฟน: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Fio de microfone: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Outro
es: Rosca de micrófono: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Otros
fr: Câble du microphone: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Autre
hr-HR: Navoj mikrofona: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Ostalo
tr: Mikrofon Kablosu: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Diğer
da: Mikrofontråd: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Andet
en: Microphone thread: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Other
hu: Mikrofon menete: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Egyéb
sv: Mikrofontråd: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Övrigt
fi: Mikrofonikierre: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Muu
zh-CN: 麦克风线: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; 其他
nb: Mikrofontråd: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Annet
ko: 마이크 스레드: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; 기타